Utah statutes.
26-8a-206.   Personnel stress management program.
(1)  The department shall develop and implement a statewide program to provide
support and counseling for personnel who have been exposed to one or more
stressful incidents in the course of providing emergency services.
(2)  This program shall include:
(a)  ongoing training for agencies providing emergency services and counseling
program volunteers; and
(b)  critical incident stress debriefing for personnel at no cost to the
emergency provider.
